Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 3. Operating Hours

§ 13-1-301.
Banks.

Any bank may close on legal holidays and Saturday. Each day the bank is closed is not a business day. Any act required or permitted to be performed by a bank on Saturday may be performed on the next succeeding business day and no liability or loss of rights shall result.

If the state banking commissioner believes that an emergency exists affecting any bank, he may authorize the bank to close and shall make a public announcement of the authorization. As used in this subsection “emergency” includes any condition which may interfere with the conduct or the normal operations of a bank or poses a threat to the safety or security of employees or property of a bank.

If the officers of a bank believe that conditions exist which pose a threat to the safety or security of bank personnel or property, they may close the bank.

A bank may close temporarily if the convenience and need of the local community in which the bank is located would best be served by the closing. A bank shall not be closed for more than twenty-four (24) consecutive hours pursuant to this subsection.

As used in this section, “bank” includes the main office and any branches.

Any transaction by a bank performed outside regular banking hours is not invalid solely because of that fact.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 41, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 13-38.1, 13-39; Laws 1959, ch. 54, § 1; 1961, ch. 26, § 1; 1971, ch. 218, § 2; 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1993, ch. 115, § 1; 1998, ch. 64, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to legal holidays, see §

8-4-101

.